Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201076-2213
Licensed residential real property
appraiser, defined.

Licensed residential real property appraiser means a
person who holds a valid credential as a licensed residential real property appraiser issued under
the Real Property Appraiser Act. Licensed
residential real property appraiser includes persons defined as licensed real
property appraisers prior to April 15, 2010.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 16;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 3.
April 15, 2010